Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 3
REGISTRATION RECORDS

1-5-301. Registration record for partisan elections.

Digital registration records shall be maintained in the centralized statewide registration system created pursuant to section 1-2-301.

The county clerk and recorder shall provide the voter registration and voting records information to election judges for use at voter service and polling centers in all applicable elections.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 706, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 710, § 39, effective May 10.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (SB 14-161), ch. 160, p. 560, § 11, effective May 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-6-301 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

In 2013, this section was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-5-302. Computer lists may be used in lieu of original registration records.

For the purposes of all elections, the county clerk and recorder may substitute and supply computer lists of registered electors within the political subdivision for the original registration record. Following a primary, general, or congressional vacancy election, the county clerk and recorder shall record the date of election and, if a primary election, the party ballot received on the registered elector's original registration record.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 706, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 837, § 52, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

Entire section amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 579, § 40, effective May 18.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-6-302 as it existed prior to 1992.

1-5-303. Registration records for nonpartisan elections.

No later than the fortieth day preceding the date of the scheduled nonpartisan election, the designated election official shall order the registration records. The designated election official may order a complete list of the registered electors as of the thirtieth day prior to the election with a supplementary list provided on the twentieth day, or the designated election official may order a complete list as of the twentieth day prior to the election. The county clerk and recorder shall certify and make available a complete copy of the list of the registered electors of each general election precinct that is located within the county and is involved in the election and, if the supplemental list is ordered no later than the twentieth day preceding the election, shall certify and make available a supplemental list of the eligible electors who have become eligible since the earlier list was certified. These lists shall substitute for the original registration record.

The registration list for each election precinct that is certified thirty days before the election shall contain the names and addresses of all registered electors residing within the precinct at the close of business on the fortieth day preceding the election. The registration list for each election precinct that is certified no later than twenty days before the election shall contain the names and addresses of all eligible electors residing within the precinct at the close of business on the thirtieth day prior to the election. If a supplemental list is ordered, it shall contain the names and addresses of all eligible electors who have become eligible within the period since the initial registration list was certified through the close of business on the thirtieth day preceding the election.

Costs for the lists shall be assessed by the county clerk and recorder and paid by the political subdivision holding the election. The fee for furnishing the lists shall be no less than twenty-five dollars for the entire list nor more than one cent for each name contained on the registration list, whichever is greater.

The order for the list may be canceled if the election is canceled pursuant to section 1-5-208 and the county clerk and recorder has not already prepared the list.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 706, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 95:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 838, § 53, effective July 1.

1-5-304. Lists of property owners.

For elections where owning property in the political subdivision is a requirement for voting in the election, no later than the fortieth day preceding the date of the election, the designated election official, in addition to using the affidavit prescribed in section 32-1-806, C.R.S., shall order the list of property owners from the county assessor. Except as otherwise required under subsection (2) of this section, the county assessor shall certify and deliver an initial list of all recorded owners of taxable real and personal property within the political subdivision no later than thirty days before the election. The supplemental list for the political subdivision shall be provided no later than twenty days before the election and shall contain the names and addresses of all recorded owners who have become owners no later than thirty days prior to the election and after the initial list of property owners was provided. The cost for the lists shall be assessed by the county assessors and paid by the political subdivision holding the election. The fee for furnishing the lists shall be no less than twenty-five dollars for both lists nor more than one cent for each name contained on the lists, whichever is greater.

The designated election official of a special district may order the list described in subsection (1) of this section of all recorded owners of taxable real and personal property within the special district as of the thirtieth day before the election with a supplementary list to be provided on the twentieth day before the election, or the designated election official may order a complete list as of the twentieth day before the election.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 707, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1411, § 49, effective July 1.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1161, § 29, effective July 1.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 773, § 45, effective May 20; entire section amended, p. 451, § 6, effective August 4.

Editor's note:

Amendments to this section by Senate Bill 99-025 and House Bill 99-1268 were harmonized.